Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4761.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 604A.12, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Immunity from liability; livestock events. A deleted text begin nonprofitdeleted text end corporation, association, or organization, or a person or other entity donating services, livestock, facilities, or equipment for the use of a deleted text begin nonprofitdeleted text end corporation, association, or organization, is not liable for the death of or an injury to a participant resulting from the inherent risks of livestock activities. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to causes of action accruing on or after that date. new text end